Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.150

Use of term restricted—Group certificates, licenses, or registrations prohibited.

(1) The term "state-certified real estate appraiser," "state-licensed real estate appraiser," or "state-registered appraiser trainee" may only be used to refer to individuals who hold the certificate, license, or registration and may not be used following or immediately in connection with the name or signature of a firm, partnership, corporation, group, or limited liability company, or in such manner that it might be interpreted as referring to a firm, partnership, corporation, group, limited liability company, or anyone other than an individual holder of the certificate, license, or registration.

(2) No certificate, license, or registration may be issued under this chapter to a corporation, partnership, firm, limited liability company, or group. This shall not be construed to prevent a state-certified or state-licensed appraiser from signing an appraisal report on behalf of a corporation, partnership, firm, group practice, or limited liability company, nor may it be construed to prevent a state-registered appraiser trainee from signing an appraisal report under the supervision of a state-certified real estate appraiser on behalf of a corporation, partnership, firm, group practice, or limited liability company.

[ 2005 c 339 s 12; 1996 c 182 s 8; 1993 c 30 s 15; 1989 c 414 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

Effective dates—1996 c 182: See note following RCW 18.140.005.